Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.300

Finding.

The legislature finds compelling state interests in compensating the victims of crime and in preventing criminals from profiting from their crimes. RCW 7.68.310 through 7.68.340 are intended to advance both of these interests.

[ 1993 c 288 s 3.]